src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_ODD_X_adjCompU !special case for comparative form of certain bisyllabic adjectives
+Sg+Acc:u%>v K ;
+Sg+Gen:u%> K ;
+Sg+Ill:u%>j K ;
+Sg+Ine:u2%>n K ;
+Sg+Ela:u2%>st K ;
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:u2%>s K ;
+Sg+Com:u2%>jn K ;
+Ess:u2%>n K ;
+Abe:u%>htá K ;
+Pl+Nom:u%> K ;
+Pl+Acc:u2%>jt K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:u2%>jd K ;
+Pl+Gen:u2%>j K ;
+Pl+Ill:u2%>jda K ;
+Pl+Ine:u2%>jn K ;
+Pl+Ela:u2%>jst K ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:u2%>js K ;
+Pl+Com:u2%>j K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:u2%>jgum K ;


LEXICON N_ODD_DIM !N_ODD diminutive root add v3
+Der/Dimin+N:a%> N_ODD_DIM_s2 ;

LEXICON N_ODD_DIM_s2 !N_ODD diminutive root with variant 
:tj N_DIM_s2 ;
+Use/NG:dtj NO_VH_X_s2 ; !add everything but nom.sg


! contracted
! ----------

LEXICON N_CONTR_OJU !båtsoj<->buhtsu
+N+Sg+Nom:oj^WG%> K ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom:oj^WG%> R ; !compound element in weak-grade with final C, e.g. båtsojsujtár
+N+Cmp/SgGen:u%> R ; !compound element in strong-grade without final C, e.g. buhtsubärrgo
N_CONTR_O ;

LEXICON N_CONTR_OU !suolo<->sullu
+N+Sg+Nom:o^WG%> K ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom:o^WG%> R ; !compound element in weak-grade
+N+Cmp/SgGen:o%> R ; !compound element in strong-grade without final C, e.g. buhtsubärrgo
N_CONTR_O ;

LEXICON N_CONTR_O !båtsoj<->buhtsu, suolo<->sullu (except NOM.SG)
+N+Sg+Acc:u%>v K ;
+N+Sg+Gen:u%> K ;
+N+Sg+Ill:u%>j K ;
+N+Sg+Ine:u%>n K ;
+N+Sg+Ela:u%>st K ;
+N+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:u%>s K ;
+N+Sg+Com:u%>jn K ;
+N+Ess:u%>n K ;
+N+Ess:u%>n K ;
+N+Abe:u%>dak K ; ! XXX
+N+Pl+Nom:u%> K ;
+N+Pl+Acc:u%>jt K ;
+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:u%>jd K ;
+N+Pl+Gen:u%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Ill:u%>jda K ;
+N+Pl+Ine:u%>jn K ;
+N+Pl+Ela:u%>jst K ;
+N+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:u%>js K ;
+N+Pl+Com:u%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:u%>jgum K ;
+N: N_CONTR_O_DIM ; !buhtsutj

LEXICON N_CONTR_AJA !ålmáj<->ålmá
+N+Sg+Nom:á^WGj%> K ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom:á^WGj%> R ; !compound element in weak-grade with final-C
+N+Cmp/SgGen:á%> R ; !compound element in strong-grade with not final-C; cf. ålbmábarrgo
+N+Sg+Acc:á%>v K ;
+N+Sg+Gen:á%> K ;
+N+Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;
+N+Sg+Ine:á%>n K ;
+N+Sg+Ela:á%>st K ;
+N+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:á%>s K ;
+N+Sg+Com:á%>jn K ;
+N+Ess:á%>n K ; !check ^WG - is it required by ESS? is it implemented by twolc?
!+N+Ess:á^WGn K ; !check ^WG - is it required by ESS? is it implemented by twolc?
+N+Abe:á%>dak K ; ! XXX
+N+Pl+Nom:á%> K ;
+N+Pl+Acc:á%>jt K ;
+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:á%>jd K ;
+N+Pl+Gen:á%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Ill:á%>jda K ;
+N+Pl+Ine:á%>jn K ;
+N+Pl+Ela:á%>jst K ;
+N+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:á%>js K ;
+N+Pl+Com:á%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:á%>jgum K ;
+N: N_CONTR_DIM ; !ålmátj


LEXICON N_CONTR_ESAA !sarves<->sarvvá
+N+Sg+Nom:e^WGs%> K ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom:e^WGs%> R ; !compound element in weak-grade with final-C
+N+Cmp/SgGen:á%> R ; !compound element in weak-grade with final-C ; not sure! cf. fállábärrgo
+N+Sg+Acc:á%>v K ;
+N+Sg+Gen:á%> K ;
+N+Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;
+N+Sg+Ine:á%>n K ;
+N+Sg+Ela:á%>st K ;
+N+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:á%>s K ;
+N+Sg+Com:á%>jn K ;
+N+Ess:á%>n K ; !check ^WG - is it required by ESS? is it implemented by twolc?
!+N+Ess:á^WGn K ; !check ^WG - is it required by ESS? is it implemented by twolc?
+N+Abe:á%>dak K ; ! XXX
+N+Pl+Nom:á%> K ;
+N+Pl+Acc:á%>jt K ;
+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:á%>jd K ;
+N+Pl+Gen:á%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Ill:á%>jda K ;
+N+Pl+Ine:á%>jn K ;
+N+Pl+Ela:á%>jst K ;
+N+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:á%>js K ;
+N+Pl+Com:á%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:á%>jgum K ;
+N: N_CONTR_DIM ; !sarrvátj


LEXICON N_CONTR_O_DIM ! buhtsutj
+Der/Dimin+N:u%>tj N_DIM_s2 ;

LEXICON N_CONTR_DIM ! ålmátj, sarrvátj
+Der/Dimin+N:á%>tj N_DIM_s2 ;



!general addition of DIM case/number endings (avoids recursive DIM generation)
LEXICON N_DIM_s2 !nom.sg, then link to other forms
!+Sg+Nom: K ;
!: N_ODD_X ;
: NO_VH_X ;

LEXICON PX ! possessive suffixes (not clearly productive; initial SgNom set from Lehtiranta 1992)
+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:m # ; !cf. Lagercrantz 1957 text 426
+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:t # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:s # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxDu1:ma # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxDu2:da # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxDu3:sa # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:men # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:den # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:ska # ; 



LEXICON NO_VH_X  !tetra-syllabic forms such as ODD+DIM, monosyllabic proper Ns (no -i- in suffixes)
+Sg+Nom: K ;
: NO_VH_X_s2 ;

LEXICON NO_VH_X_s2
+Sg+Acc:av K ;
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
+Sg+Ine:in K ;
+Sg+Ela:ist K ; 
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:is K ; 
+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
+Ess:in K ;
+Pl+Nom:a K ;
+Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ijd K ;
+Pl+Gen:ij K ;
+Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
+Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
+Pl+Ela:ijst K ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:ijs K ;
+Pl+Com:ij K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:ijgum K ;


! proper noun lexica below:

LEXICON N_MONOSYL_PROPER ! monosyllabic proper nouns (mostly person names)
+N: NO_VH_X ; !add PoS, then link to morphology

!for proper names for which the inflectional paradigms are not clear (at least until more is known about how they inflect – essentially only non-Saami names)
LEXICON N_NAME_noInfl_C !C-final
+N+Sg+Nom:%> K ; 
+N: N_ODD_X ;
!diminutive for C-final names:
+N+Der/Dimin+N:a%>tj N_DIM_s2 ;

LEXICON N_NAME_noInfl_V !
+N: N_NAME_noInfl_V_s2 ;

LEXICON N_NAME_noInfl_V_s2 !V-final
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Acc:v K ;
+Sg+Gen: K ;
+Sg+Ill:j K ;
+Sg+Ine:n K ;
+Sg+Ela:st K ; 
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:s K ; 
+Sg+Com:jn K ;
+Ess:an K ;
+Pl+Nom: K ;
+Pl+Acc:jt K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:jd K ;
+Pl+Gen:j K ;
+Pl+Ill:jda K ;
+Pl+Ine:jn K ;
+Pl+Ela:jst K ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:js K ;
+Pl+Com:j K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:jgum K ;
!diminutive for V-final names:
+Der/Dimin+N:%>tj^V2E2AA N_DIM_s2 ;
